Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 35
WATER AND SEWAGE

Section

PART 1 WATER RIGHTS AND WORKS -
GENERAL

PART 2 LEASING WATER RIGHTS -
CITIES OF OVER 200,000

PART 3 WATER MAINS AND OTHER
IMPROVEMENTS - CITIES AND
TOWNS

PART 4 SEWER AND WATER
SYSTEMS

PART 5 MUNICIPAL WATER AND
SEWER BOARDS

PART 6 SEWER CONNECTIONS -
COMPULSORY

PART 7 SEWER RATES - AREA OUTSIDE
CITIES OR TOWNS